Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Basic and Nonbasic Local Exchange Services

278.541.
Definitions for KRS 278.541 to 278.544.

In addition to the definitions set forth in KRS

278.010

and 278.516(2), the following definitions shall apply to KRS

278.541

to

278.544

:

“Basic local exchange service” means a retail telecommunications service consisting of a primary, single, voice-grade line provided to the premises of residential or business customers with the following features and functions only:

Unlimited calls within the telephone utility’s local exchange area;

Dual-tone multifrequency dialing; and

Access to the following:

911 emergency service;

All locally available interexchange companies;

Directory assistance;

Operator services;

Relay services; and

A standard alphabetical directory listing that includes names, addresses, and telephone numbers at no additional charge.

With respect to local exchange carriers, basic local exchange service also shall include any mandatory extended area service routes accessible as a local call within that exchange area on or before July 12, 2006. Basic local exchange service does not include any features or functions other than those listed in this subsection, nor any other communications service, even if such service should include features and functions listed herein;

“Electing utility” means a telephone utility that elects to operate under KRS

278.543

;

“Local exchange carrier” or “LEC” has the same meaning as defined in 47

U.S.C. sec. 153(26)

;

“Incumbent local exchange carrier” or “ILEC” has the same meaning as defined in 47

U.S.C. sec. 251(h)

;

“Nonbasic service” means all retail telecommunications services provided to a residential or business customer, all arrangements with respect to those services, and all packages of products or services; provided, however, nonbasic service includes basic local exchange service only if the customer chooses to purchase a package that includes basic local exchange service as a component of the package;

“Optional telephone feature” means any of those central office-based features that were tariffed by a local exchange carrier on or before February 1, 2006, that, where available:

Are available to a line-side connection in a telephone switch;

Are available on a stand-alone basis separate from a bundled offering; and

Enhance the utility of basic local exchange service.

The term includes
but is not limited to call forwarding, call waiting, and caller ID;

“Package” means combinations of retail products or services offered, whether at a single price or with the availability of the price for one (1) product or service contingent on the purchase of others; and

“Telephone utility” includes local exchange carriers and telecommunications carriers as those terms are defined in 47

U.S.C. sec. 153

and any federal regulations implementing that section, except that the definition shall not include commercial mobile radio service providers as defined in 47

U.S.C. sec. 332

and the Federal Communications Commission’s lawful regulations promulgated thereunder.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 239, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2016 ch. 111, § 26, effective July 15, 2016.

278.542.
Effect of KRS 278.541 to 278.544 on commission’s jurisdiction — Filing by telephone utilities required.

Nothing in KRS

278.541

to

278.544

shall affect the commission’s jurisdiction with respect to:

Any agreement or arrangement between or among ILECs;

Any agreement or arrangement between or among ILECs and other local exchange carriers;

Consumer complaints as to compliance with basic local exchange service obligations, and the quality of basic voice-grade service transmission for basic and nonbasic services, consistent with accepted industry standards for telecommunications services;

The 911 emergency service as set forth in KRS

65.750

to

65.760

or wireless enhanced emergency 911 systems as set forth in KRS

65.7621

to

65.7643

;

Accuracy of billing for telecommunications services, in accordance with the truth-in-billing regulations prescribed by the Federal Communications Commission;

Assessments as set forth in KRS

278.130

,

278.140

, and

278.150

;

Unauthorized change of telecommunications providers or “slamming” under KRS

278.535

;

Billing of telecommunications services not ordered by or on behalf of the consumer or “cramming” to the extent that such services do not comply with the truth-in-billing regulations prescribed by the Federal Communications Commission;

The federal Universal Service Fund and Lifeline Services Program and any Kentucky state counterpart;

Any special telephone service programs as set forth in KRS

278.547

to

278.5499

;

Tariffs, except as expressly provided for in KRS

278.541

to

278.544

;

Setting objectives for performance as to basic local exchange service; except that the objectives shall not exceed existing commission standards or associated penalties as of July 12, 2006;

Prohibiting price differences among retail telecommunications customers to the extent that such differences are attributable to race, creed, color, religion, sex, or national origin; or

Ensuring that a telephone utility furnishes safe, adequate, and reasonable basic local exchange service to customers within that utility’s service area.

Telephone utilities operating pursuant to KRS

278.541

to

278.544

shall file with the commission a form containing:

The complete name of the telephone utility;

The physical address of its principal office; and

The name, title, and telephone number of the person responsible for answering consumer complaints on behalf of the telephone utility.

No telephone utility shall engage in predatory pricing as defined by the United States Supreme Court in Brooke Group Ltd. v. Brown & Williamson Tobacco Corp., 509 U.S. 209 (1993).

Nothing in KRS

278.541

to

278.544

shall affect the alternative regulation process for small telephone utilities as set forth in KRS

278.516

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 239, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2016 ch. 111, § 27, effective July 15, 2016.

278.543.
Adoption of price regulation plan — Rate caps and adjustments — Jurisdiction of commission — Exemptions — Withdrawal from regulation under KRS 278.541 to 278.544.

Any telephone utility, at its discretion and without commission approval, may elect to adopt the price regulation plan set forth below.

An election under this section shall be effective immediately upon written notification from the electing utility to the commission. The election shall remain effective until withdrawn by the electing utility.

The rate for basic local exchange service for an electing utility, other than an electing small telephone utility as defined in KRS

278.516

, shall be capped for a period of sixty (60) months from the date of the election. Subject to the limitations in KRS

278.541

to

278.544

, an electing utility may seek a rate adjustment for basic local exchange services according to the terms of regulation applicable to the basic local exchange services of any ILEC on June 30, 2006, or a previously approved or new price regulation proposal for basic service pursuant to KRS

278.512

. These rate adjustments may become effective on or after the day following the end of the sixty (60) months.

Electing utilities shall retain on file with the commission tariffs for basic local exchange services and intrastate switched-access services. Tariffs filed in accordance with subsection (2) of this section shall be deemed valid and binding upon the effective date stated in the tariff.

An electing utility’s rates for intrastate switched-access service shall not exceed its rates for this service that were in effect on the day prior to the date the utility filed its notice of election.

The commission shall have original jurisdiction over complaints as to basic local exchange service of any electing telephone utility, except that the commission shall not have jurisdiction to set, investigate, or determine rates as to any electing telephone utility other than as set forth in this section. Upon a complaint in writing made against any electing telephone utility by any person stating that basic local exchange service in which that complainant is directly interested is unreasonable, unsafe, insufficient, or unjustly discriminatory, or that basic local exchange service is inadequate or cannot be obtained, the commission shall proceed, with or without notice, to make such investigation as it deems necessary or convenient. The commission may also make such an investigation on its own motion. No order concerning a complaint shall be entered by the commission without a formal public hearing. A person may intervene in accordance with commission administrative regulations. The commission shall fix the time and place for the hearing and shall provide notice to the electing telephone utility and the complainant not less than twenty (20) days in advance. The commission may dismiss any complaint without a hearing if it decides that a hearing is not necessary, in the public interest, or for the protection of substantial rights. The complainant and the electing telephone utility shall be entitled to be heard in person or by an attorney and to introduce evidence.

An electing utility’s rates, charges, earnings, and revenues shall be deemed to be just and reasonable under KRS

278.030

and administrative regulations promulgated thereunder upon election. Except as set forth in KRS 278.542(1)(a) and (b), an electing telephone utility shall be exempt from KRS

278.190

,

278.192

,

278.200

, 278.230(3),

278.255

,

278.260

,

278.270

,

278.280

,

278.290

, and

278.300

and administrative regulations promulgated thereunder. The utility shall also be exempt from any rules, orders, or regulations of the commission requiring the retention or filing of financial reports, classifications, depreciation or other schedules, or any other information not required by the Federal Communications Commission.

An electing small telephone utility, as defined in KRS

278.516

, may withdraw from being so regulated by providing written notice of withdrawal to the commission.

Under the following circumstances, any electing utility may withdraw from being so regulated by providing written notice to the commission:

Upon the approval pursuant to KRS

278.512

of a company-specific alternative regulation plan; or

Upon filing notice with the commission of its adoption of the applicable provisions of any alternative regulation plan previously approved by the commission. The adoption shall become effective upon filing of the notice.

The rates for basic local exchange service for an electing small telephone utility as defined in KRS

278.516

shall be capped for a period of twelve (12) months from the date of the election. Annually thereafter, an electing small telephone utility may not increase rates for an individual basic local exchange service by more than the increase in the annual average of the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for the most recent calendar year as published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 239, § 3, effective July 12, 2006.

278.5435.
Modification of price regulation plan — Permitted and prohibited actions — Jurisdiction of commission — Exemptions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a telephone utility operating under a price regulation plan pursuant to KRS

278.543

may, at any time after the expiration of the applicable rate cap period set forth in that section, elect to operate under the modifications to that plan contained in this section. The election of this modification by the utility shall become effective upon the filing of a notice with the commission. The notice shall identify all exchanges served by the modifying utility which, as of January 1, 2015, contained fifteen thousand (15,000) or more housing units based on United States Census data current as of January 1, 2015.

As used in this section:

“Basic local exchange service” has the same meaning as in KRS

278.541

;

“Exchange” means a geographical area established by a telephone utility for the administration of telephone service. An exchange may embrace a city, town, or village and its environs or a portion thereof, and may consist of one (1) or more central offices together with the associated plant used in furnishing communication services in that area;

“IP-enabled service,” as used in the context of subsection (4)(c) of this section, means any service, capability, functionality, or application provided using Internet protocol, or any successor protocol that enables an end user to send or receive voice communication, either separately or in conjunction with data communication, video communication, or both, in Internet protocol format, or any successor format;

“Modifying utility” means a utility that makes an election to adopt the modified price regulation plan set out in this section; and

“Voice service” means a retail service provided through any technology or service arrangement that includes the applicable functionalities described in 47 C.F.R. sec. 54.101(a).

In exchanges with fifteen thousand (15,000) or more housing units as of January 1, 2015, based on United States Census data current as of January 1, 2015, and after September 1, 2017, in all exchanges:

The commission shall not impose any requirements or otherwise regulate the terms, conditions, rates, or availability of any retail service of the modifying utility; and

For exchanges with fifteen thousand (15,000) or more housing units, the tariffs of a modifying utility which are in effect on June 24, 2015, shall remain binding until such tariffs are withdrawn by the utility. For all exchanges, the tariffs of a modifying utility which are in effect on September 1, 2017, shall remain binding until they are withdrawn by the utility.

The provisions of this subsection shall apply until September 1, 2017, to all areas that are not described in subsection (3) of this section and in which the modifying utility is operating as an incumbent local exchange carrier, as defined in 47

U.S.C. sec. 251(h)

, as of June 24, 2015.

In response to a request for service at a location to which the modifying utility or any predecessor in interest has not installed landline facilities necessary to provide basic local exchange service, the modifying utility shall offer voice service either directly or through an affiliate. The modifying utility is not obligated to offer basic local exchange service at the location. The commission shall not impose any requirements or otherwise regulate the terms, conditions, rates, or availability of the voice service.

In response to all other requests for service, the modifying utility may offer the requesting customer an IP-enabled service or a wireless service either directly or through an affiliate.

If the requesting customer does not order an IP-enabled service or a wireless service, the modifying utility, upon request by the customer, shall provide basic local exchange service at that location. The commission retains the jurisdiction to enforce this obligation.

If the requesting customer orders an IP-enabled service or a wireless service, the modifying utility shall notify the customer in writing that:

It is providing service using an IP-enabled service or a wireless service provided by the modifying utility or an affiliate; and

The customer has sixty (60) days from service initiation to notify the modifying utility in writing that the customer no longer wants the service.

If the customer gives written notice within sixty (60) days that the service is no longer wanted, the modifying utility, upon request by the customer, shall provide basic local exchange service at that location. The commission retains the jurisdiction to enforce this obligation.

If the customer does not give written notice that the service is no longer wanted within sixty (60) days, the modifying utility shall offer voice service, either directly or through an affiliate, at the requested location. The modifying utility shall not be obligated to offer basic local exchange service at that location. The commission shall not impose any requirements or otherwise regulate the terms, conditions, rates, or availability of the voice service.

Nothing in this section:

Shall affect the obligations of a modifying utility under federal law, including without limitation any obligation to maintain existing voice service in compliance with rules and orders of the Federal Communications Commission; or

Diminishes or expands the commission’s jurisdiction over wholesale rights, duties, and obligations of carriers or over complaints regarding anti- competitive practices under federal and state law, including subsequent rules and orders of the Federal Communications Commission that address carrier-to-carrier issues in and applicable to this state. Unless otherwise directed by federal law or regulation, carrier-to-carrier complaints within the commission’s jurisdiction shall be resolved by final commission order within one hundred eighty (180) days of the filing of the complaint.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 2, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 43, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

278.544.
Provisions applicable to all telephone utilities.

The following provisions of this section shall apply and be enforced equally to all telephone utilities, unless otherwise specifically stated in this section.

Telephone utilities may file with the commission schedules or tariffs reflecting the rates, terms, and conditions for nonbasic services that are generally available to all subscribers qualifying for the rates, terms, and conditions. The rates, terms, and conditions for basic and nonbasic services shall be valid upon the effective date stated in the schedule. Tariffs for nonbasic services in effect on July 12, 2006, shall continue to be effective as binding rates, terms, and conditions until withdrawn or modified by the telephone utility.

A telephone utility offering a package that includes any optional telephone features tariffed as of February 1, 2006, shall maintain schedules or tariffs on file with the commission for each such optional telephone feature available on a stand-alone basis to residential customers who purchase basic local exchange service from that telephone utility.

Notwithstanding the terms of any adopted regulation plan or any provision of law to the contrary, telephone utilities may provide nonbasic services pursuant to terms and conditions provided to the customer. Telephone utilities shall not be required to file nonbasic contracts with the commission. Telephone utilities shall permit a residential customer with nonbasic service to purchase basic local exchange service and any optional telephone feature on file in a schedule or tariff at the commission at the current rates, terms, and conditions without incurring termination charges, unless the customer has entered into an agreement containing termination charges and the customer is given thirty (30) days from receipt of the terms and conditions to cancel the agreement. If a customer cancels the agreement within thirty (30) days from receipt of the terms and conditions, termination charges are limited to the price of unreturned equipment or services, including installation, received at that point. Telephone utilities that provide services pursuant to this subsection shall provide customers with notice, as part of the terms and conditions of such services, that basic local exchange service and any optional telephone feature on file in a schedule or tariff with the commission may be purchased separately at the price posted on the company’s Web site or on file with the commission.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, nonbasic services offered pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be set by the marketplace and are not governed by KRS

278.030

and administrative regulations promulgated thereunder. The nonbasic services are exempt from action or review by the commission under KRS

278.160

,

278.170

,

278.180

,

278.190

,

278.192

,

278.200

, 278.230(3),

278.250

,

278.255

,

278.260

,

278.270

,

278.280

,

278.290

, and

278.300

and administrative regulations promulgated thereunder, except as specifically stated in KRS

278.541

to

278.544

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 239, § 4, effective July 12, 2006.

278.545.
Countywide service by major telephone company required, when. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 495, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; repealed by 2019 ch. 66, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.